Maryland, session 2025, SB0430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Land Use
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0430*

SENATE BILL 430
1–401.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(1) this subtitle, including Parts II and III (Charter county –
Comprehensive plans);
(2) § 1–101(l), (m), and (o) (Definitions – “Plan”, “Priority funding area”,
and “Sensitive area”);
(3) § 1–201 (Visions);
(4) § 1–206 (Required education);
(5) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(6) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(7) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 5 (Growth Tiers);
(9) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle Parking);
(10) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(11) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(12) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(13) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(14) § 4–212 (Agritourism);
(15) § 4–213 (Alcohol production);
(16) § 4–214 (Agricultural alcohol production);
(17) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(18) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
(19) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);

SENATE BILL 430 3
(20) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
(21) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
(22) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title 7,
Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
(23) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
(24) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
(25) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
(26) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County Provisions
– Baltimore County);
(27) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
(28) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County Provisions
– Howard County);
(29) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County Provisions
– Talbot County); [and]
(30) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty); AND
(31) TITLE 12 (REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP).
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
10–103.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to Baltimore
City.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(1) this title;
(2) § 1–101(m) (Definitions – “Priority funding area”);
(3) § 1–101(o) (Definitions – “Sensitive area”);
(4) § 1–201 (Visions);

SENATE BILL 430
(5) § 1–206 (Required education);
(6) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(7) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(9) Title 1, Subtitle 4, Parts II and III (Home Rule Counties –
Comprehensive Plans; Implementation);
(10) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(11) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(12) § 4–205 (Administrative adjustments);
(13) § 4–207 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(14) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(15) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(16) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(17) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
(18) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
(19) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
(20) Title 7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities
Agreements);
(21) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
(22) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability); [and]
(23) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty); AND
(24) TITLE 12 (REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP).
TITLE 12. REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP.
SUBTITLE 1. GENERAL PROVISIONS.

SENATE BILL 430 5
12–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO” MEANS THE TOTAL NUMBER OF JOBS BY
PLACE OF WORK DIVIDED BY THE TOTAL NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS.
(C) “LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP” MEANS THE SHARE OF A
REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP APPORTIONED TO A LOCAL
JURISDICTION UNDER § 12–201(B) OF THIS TITLE.
(D) “REGION” MEANS AN AREA DESIGNATED UNDER § 12–102 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(E) “REGIONAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP” MEANS THE NUMBER OF
HOUSING UNITS NEEDED FOR A REGION’S JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO TO BE BELOW
1.5 ACCORDING TO THE CALCULATION MADE UNDER § 12–201(A) OF THIS TITLE.
12–102.
FOR PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE, REGIONS ARE DESIGNATED AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE BALTIMORE REGION INCLUDES ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY,
BALTIMORE COUNTY, CARROLL COUNTY, HARFORD COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY,
AND BALTIMORE CITY;
(2) THE WASHINGTON SUBURBAN REGION INCLUDES FREDERICK
COUNTY, MONTGOMERY COUNTY, AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY;
(3) THE SOUTHERN MARYLAND REGION INCLUDES CALVERT
COUNTY, CHARLES COUNTY, AND ST. MARY’S COUNTY;
(4) THE WESTERN MARYLAND REGION INCLUDES ALLEGANY
COUNTY, GARRETT COUNTY, AND WASHINGTON COUNTY;
(5) THE UPPER EASTERN SHORE REGION INCLUDES CAROLINE
COUNTY, CECIL COUNTY, KENT COUNTY, QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY, AND TALBOT
COUNTY; AND
(6) THE LOWER EASTERN SHORE REGION INCLUDES DORCHESTER
COUNTY, SOMERSET COUNTY, WICOMICO COUNTY, AND WORCESTER COUNTY.

SENATE BILL 430
SUBTITLE 2. REQUIREMENTS.
12–201.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL
PUBLISH, FOR EACH REGION DESIGNATED UNDER § 12–102 OF THIS TITLE:
(1) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS;
(2) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF JOBS BY PLACE OF WORK;
(3) THE JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO;
(4) THE NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS NEEDED TO BE PRODUCED FOR
THE REGION TO REACH A JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO OF 1.5 OR LESS; AND
(5) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN THE EXISTING NUMBER OF HOUSING
UNITS AND THE NUMBER OF HOUSING UNITS NEEDED FOR THE REGION TO REACH A
JOBS–TO–HOUSING RATIO OF 1.5 OR LESS.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AND
THE DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING SHALL APPORTION A REGIONAL HOUSING
INFRASTRUCTURE GAP TO:
(1) EACH COUNTY BASED ON THE SHARE OF REGIONAL JOBS
LOCATED IN THE COUNTY; AND
(2) EACH INCORPORATED MUNICIPALITY BASED ON THE SHARE OF
REGIONAL JOBS LOCATED IN THE MUNICIPALITY.
12–202.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AFFORDABLE” MEANS THAT HOUSING COSTS DO NOT EXCEED
30% OF A HOUSEHOLD’S INCOME.
(3) “AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT” MEANS A DWELLING UNIT THAT IS
DEED–RESTRICTED TO BE AFFORDABLE TO A HOUSEHOLD EARNING 60% OR LESS
OF THE AREA MEDIAN INCOME FOR A PERIOD OF AT LEAST 40 YEARS.

SENATE BILL 430 7
(4) “AREA MEDIAN INCOME” MEANS THE MEDIAN HOUSEHOLD
INCOME FOR THE AREA ADJUSTED FOR HOUSEHOLD SIZE AS PUBLISHED AND
ANNUALLY UPDATED BY THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN
DEVELOPMENT.
(5) “HOUSING UNIT BUILT” MEANS A NEWLY CONSTRUCTED OR
SUBSTANTIALLY RENOVATED RESIDENTIAL DWELLING UNIT THAT HAS RECEIVED A
USE AND OCCUPANCY PERMIT FROM A LOCAL JURISDICTION ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2026.
(6) (I) “RAIL STATION” MEANS A PRESENT OR PLANNED:
1. MARC STATION ALONG THE PENN, CAMDEN, OR
BRUNSWICK LINES;
2. BALTIMORE METRO SUBWAYLINK STATION;
3. BALTIMORE LIGHT RAILLINK STATION;
4. METRORAIL SYSTEM STATION; OR
5. ANY OTHER PASSENGER RAIL STATION.
(II) A RAIL STATION SHALL BE CONSIDERED “PLANNED” IF IT IS
ON A FINALIZED RAIL ROUTE WITH COMPLETED DEVELOPMENT APPROVALS.
(B) (1) THE NUMBER OF UNITS IN THE LOCAL HOUSING
INFRASTRUCTURE GAP MAY BE REDUCED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) FOR EVERY 1 HOUSING UNIT BUILT WITHIN THREE–QUARTERS OF
A MILE OF A RAIL STATION, 1.5 HOUSING UNITS MAY BE SUBTRACTED FROM THE
LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP.
(3) FOR EVERY 1 AFFORDABLE HOUSING UNIT BUILT, 1.5 HOUSING
UNITS MAY BE SUBTRACTED FROM THE LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP.
(C) CALCULATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE
COMBINED TO SUBTRACT MORE THAN 1.5 HOUSING UNITS FROM THE LOCAL
HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP PER 1 HOUSING UNIT BUILT.
(D) (1) IN ORDER TO REDUCE A LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP
UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL SUBMIT

SENATE BILL 430
DOCUMENTATION TO THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT.
(2) A SUBMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE IN THE FORM AND MANNER THAT THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND
COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT REQUIRES.
12–203.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AREA WITH INADEQUATE WATER OR WASTEWATER FACILITIES”
MEANS:
(I) AN AREA OUTSIDE AN EXISTING OR PLANNED WATER AND
SEWER SERVICE AREA AS IDENTIFIED IN AN ADOPTED COUNTY PLAN UNDER TITLE
9, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE; OR
(II) AN AREA INSIDE AN EXISTING OR PLANNED WATER AND
SEWER SERVICE AREA AS IDENTIFIED IN AN ADOPTED COUNTY PLAN UNDER TITLE
9, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE ENVIRONMENT ARTICLE, WHERE THE CONNECTING WATER
OR WASTEWATER FACILITY:
1. DOES NOT HAVE ADEQUATE CAPACITY OR IS ABOVE
80% CAPACITY; AND
2. DOES NOT HAVE A CAPACITY MANAGEMENT PLAN
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF THE ENVIRONMENT.
(3) “AREA ZONED FOR HEAVY INDUSTRIAL USE” MEANS AN AREA
THAT:
(I) DOES NOT ALLOW RESIDENTIAL USES; AND
(II) ALLOWS FOR INTENSE INDUSTRIAL ACTIVITIES, SUCH AS
HEAVY MANUFACTURING, ASSEMBLING, OR INDUSTRIAL PROCESSING ACTIVITIES,
THAT MAY CREATE SIGNIFICANT NOISE, DUST, VIBRATION, GLARE, ODORS, AND
OTHER ADVERSE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS.
(4) “CURRENT OR PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT” MEANS:

SENATE BILL 430 9
(I) A SCHOOL’S FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT AT THE TIME OF THE
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT APPLICATION; OR
(II) A SCHOOL’S PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT FOR A
SCHOOL YEAR NOT LATER THAN THE 7TH FULL SCHOOL YEAR AFTER THE TIME OF
THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION.
(5) “DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION”
INCLUDES TO:
(I) DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION AT
ANY STATE IN THE DEVELOPMENT PROCESS, INCLUDING ANY REQUIRED LAND USE
APPROVALS OR ENTITLEMENTS NECESSARY FOR THE ISSUANCE OF A BUILDING
PERMIT; AND
(II) REQUIRE THAT A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT WAIT A
PERIOD OF 1 OR MORE YEARS TO RECEIVE A BUILDING PERMIT.
(6) “GEOGRAPHICALLY ADJACENT SCHOOL” MEANS A SCHOOL THAT:
(I) IS OF THE SAME GRADE CONFIGURATION OR SHARES GRADE
BAND OVERLAP; AND
(II) HAS AN ATTENDANCE AREA GEOGRAPHICALLY
CONTIGUOUS TO THE SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AREA IN WHICH THE HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED.
(7) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT” MEANS THE NEW
CONSTRUCTION OR SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION OF A RESIDENTIAL REAL ESTATE
PROJECT.
(8) “HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION” MEANS AN
APPLICATION FOR A BUILDING PERMIT, A VARIANCE, A WAIVER, A CONDITIONAL USE
PERMIT, A SPECIAL PERMIT, A CERTIFICATION, AN AUTHORIZATION, A SITE PLAN
APPROVAL, A SUBDIVISION APPROVAL, OR ANY OTHER DETERMINATION BY A LOCAL
JURISDICTION RELATING TO A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
(9) “OBJECTIVE WRITTEN DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS” MEANS
OBJECTIVE, QUANTIFIABLE, WRITTEN DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS, CONDITIONS,
AND POLICIES THAT ARE:
(I) NOT SUBJECT TO PERSONAL OR SUBJECTIVE JUDGMENT BY
A PUBLIC OFFICIAL;

SENATE BILL 430
(II) UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE BY REFERENCE TO AN EXTERNAL
AND UNIFORM BENCHMARK OR CRITERION AVAILABLE AND KNOWABLE BY THE
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICANT; AND
(III) APPLIED TO FACILITATE AND ACCOMMODATE
DEVELOPMENT AT THE DENSITY PERMITTED ON THE SITE.
(10) “SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AREA” MEANS THE GEOGRAPHIC AREA
THAT CONTAINS THE RESIDENCES OF THE STUDENT POPULATION TO BE SERVED, AS
DESIGNATED BY A COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
4–109(C) OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(11) “SPECIFIC ADVERSE IMPACT” MEANS A SIGNIFICANT,
QUANTIFIABLE, DIRECT, AND UNAVOIDABLE IMPACT, BASED ON OBJECTIVE,
IDENTIFIED WRITTEN PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY STANDARDS, POLICIES, OR
CONDITIONS.
(12) “STATE RATED CAPACITY” MEANS THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS
THAT AN INDIVIDUAL SCHOOL HAS THE PHYSICAL CAPACITY TO ENROLL, AS
CALCULATED UNDER A FORMULA ADOPTED BY THE INTERAGENCY COMMISSION ON
SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION.
(13) “SUBSTANTIAL RENOVATION” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL REAL
ESTATE PROJECT THAT MEETS CRITERIA AS ANNUALLY ESTABLISHED AND
IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
IN THE MULTIFAMILY RENTAL FINANCING PROGRAM GUIDE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT HAS A
LOCAL HOUSING INFRASTRUCTURE GAP GREATER THAN ZERO UNITS.
(C) A LOCAL JURISDICTION HAS AN AFFIRMATIVE OBLIGATION TO
EXPEDITIOUSLY APPROVE A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION.
(D) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT
PROJECT WITHOUT A JUSTIFICATION THAT:
(1) CLEARLY OUTWEIGHS THE NEED FOR HOUSING; AND
(2) IS SUPPORTED BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE.

SENATE BILL 430 11
(E) A LOCAL JURISDICTION SHALL CITE AT LEAST ONE OF THE FOLLOWING
AS A JUSTIFICATION TO DENY A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION
THAT CLEARLY OUTWEIGHS THE NEED FOR HOUSING:
(1) (I) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT AS PROPOSED
WOULD HAVE A SPECIFIC ADVERSE IMPACT ON THE PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY TO
THE RESIDENTS THAT WOULD LIVE IN THE PROJECT; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO SATISFACTORILY
MITIGATE OR AVOID THE SPECIFIC ADVERSE IMPACT WITHOUT RENDERING THE
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT FINANCIALLY INFEASIBLE;
(2) (I) THE DENIAL OF THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT
APPLICATION OR IMPOSITION OF CONDITIONS IS REQUIRED IN ORDER TO COMPLY
WITH SPECIFIC STATE OR FEDERAL LAW; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO COMPLY WITHOUT
RENDERING THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT FINANCIALLY INFEASIBLE;
(3) (I) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED IN AN
AREA WITH INADEQUATE WATER OR WASTEWATER FACILITIES TO SERVE THE
PROJECT; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO SERVICE THE HOUSING
DEVELOPMENT PROJECT WITH WATER OR WASTEWATER FACILITIES;
(4) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED AT THE TIME
OF THE APPLICATION:
(I) IN AN AREA ZONED FOR HEAVY INDUSTRIAL USE;
(II) ON CONSERVATION PROPERTY, AS DEFINED IN § 8–209.1 OF
THE TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE; OR
(III) ON AGRICULTURAL LAND, AS DEFINED IN § 9–206 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE;
(5) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT IS LOCATED, AT THE TIME
OF APPLICATION, IN A SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AREA:
(I) THAT HAS UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE CURRENT OR
PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT FOR THE SCHOOL THAT EXCEEDS 100% OF
THE SCHOOL’S CURRENT OR ESTIMATED STATE RATED CAPACITY;

SENATE BILL 430
(II) FOR WHICH THE SUM OF THE UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE
CURRENT OR PROJECTED FULL–TIME ENROLLMENT FOR THE SCHOOL AND ITS
GEOGRAPHICALLY ADJACENT SCHOOLS EXCEEDS 100% OF THE SUM OF THE
CURRENT OR ESTIMATED STATE RATED CAPACITY FOR THOSE SCHOOLS; AND
(III) THAT HAS BEEN DETERMINED BY THE LOCAL
JURISDICTION, USING UNIFORMLY VERIFIABLE OBJECTIVE CRITERIA, TO HAVE
INADEQUATE SCHOOL CAPACITY; OR
(6) (I) THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT DOES NOT COMPLY
WITH OBJECTIVE WRITTEN DEVELOPMENT STANDARDS AT THE TIME OF
APPLICATION SUBMISSION; AND
(II) THERE IS NO FEASIBLE METHOD TO COMPLY WITHOUT
RENDERING THE DEVELOPMENT FINANCIALLY INFEASIBLE.
(F) IF A LOCAL JURISDICTION DENIES A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT
APPLICATION, THE LOCAL JURISDICTION MUST PROVIDE IN WRITING THE REASON
FOR DENIAL, SPECIFYING HOW THE DENIAL COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTIONS (C)
THROUGH (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(G) (1) THE PROPONENT OF A HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT MAY
BRING AN ACTION IN THE APPROPRIATE CIRCUIT COURT TO ENFORCE THIS
SECTION.
(2) (I) IF A COURT FINDS THAT A LOCAL JURISDICTION DENIED A
HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT APPLICATION IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION,
THE COURT SHALL ISSUE AN ORDER OR A JUDGMENT COMPELLING THE
JURISDICTION TO COMPLY WITHIN 90 DAYS WITH THIS SECTION.
(II) AN ORDER OR A JUDGMENT COMPELLING COMPLIANCE
UNDER THIS SECTION MAY INCLUDE AN ORDER OR A JUDGMENT:
1. REQUIRING THE LOCAL JURISDICTION TO TAKE
ACTION ON THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT; OR
2. DIRECTING THE LOCAL JURISDICTION TO APPROVE
THE HOUSING DEVELOPMENT PROJECT.
(3) IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT ITS ORDER OR JUDGMENT HAS
NOT BEEN CARRIED OUT WITHIN 90 DAYS, THE COURT MAY ISSUE FURTHER ORDERS
TO ENSURE THAT THE PURPOSES AND POLICIES OF THIS SECTION ARE FULFILLED.

SENATE BILL 430 13
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.